California, session 20252026, SB653.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage the use of environmentally sensitive vegetation management practices that maintain ecological health and strengthen biodiversity while mitigating wildfire risk.SEC. 2. Section 4743 is added to the Public Resources Code, immediately following Section 4742, to read:4743. (a) For purposes of this section, “environmentally sensitive vegetation management” means vegetation management that reduces catastrophic wildfire risk over the long term while supporting native wildlife and biodiversity.(b) For purposes of this section, “type conversion” means the process of dominant native plant species, including, but not limited to, native shrubs, being significantly reduced or extirpated and nonnative species colonizing an area due to disturbance events, including, but not limited to, wildfire incidents. For purposes of this section, “type conversion” does not include the removal of native species to make room for other native, but underrepresented, vegetation.(c) For a grant program that funds an environmentally sensitive vegetation management project, a state public entity shall consider incorporating into its funding guidelines all of the following criteria:(1) Follows the principles of integrated pest management as defined in Section 11401.7 of the Food and Agricultural Code.(2) Implements measures to support native plant health and biodiversity.(3) Maximizes long-term risk reduction of catastrophic wildfire.(4) Uses monitoring plans, as determined by the funding entity, and incorporates monitoring before, during, and after vegetation management treatments.(5) Uses methods that mimic natural disturbance processes to maintain rare habitats.(6) Times vegetation management to minimize the potential impacts to wildlife and minimize the reproduction of invasive plants.(7) Minimizes erosion impacts from vegetation management.(8) Includes consultation with native plant botanists and land management experts.(9) Leaves buffers around bodies of water to protect watershed health.(10) Uses prescribed grazing, as defined in Section 4004.5, where applicable.(11) Avoids habitat type conversion.(12) Implements measures to avoid impacts to rare or sensitive species and habitats, in consultation with relevant agencies.